North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-59 Information Technology Department

54-59-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” or “entity” does not include any agricultural commodity promotion group or any occupational or professional board.

“Cybersecurity” means processes or capabilities, wherein, systems, communications, and information are protected and defended against damage, unauthorized use or modification, and exploitation.

“Cybersecurity strategy” means a vision, plan of action, or guiding principles. Unless otherwise defined in this chapter, the term does not mean an associated operational plan.

“Department” means the information technology department.

“Information technology” means the use of hardware, software, services, and supporting infrastructure to manage and deliver information using voice, data, and video.

“Network services” means the equipment, software, and services necessary to transmit voice, data, or video.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 1; 2019, ch. 468, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

54-59-02.
Information technology department — Responsibility — Public policy.

The information technology department is established with the responsibility for all wide area network services planning, selection, and implementation for all state agencies, including institutions under the control of the board of higher education, counties, cities, and school districts in this state. With respect to a county, city, or school district, wide area network services are those services necessary to transmit voice, data, or video outside the county, city, or school district. In exercising its powers and duties, the department is responsible for computer support services, host software development, statewide communications services, standards for providing information to other state agencies and the public through the internet, technology planning, process redesign, and quality assurance. The department may not exercise its powers and duties in a manner that competes or otherwise interferes with the provision of telecommunications service to a private, charitable, or nonprofit entity by a privately or cooperatively owned telecommunications company.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 2; 2003 ch. 503, § 2; 2003 Sp., ch. 665, § 17.

54-59-02.1.
Prioritization of proposed major information technology projects.

The department shall submit information regarding proposed major information technology projects for executive branch state agencies, departments, and institutions, excluding institutions under control of the state board of higher education and agencies of the judicial and legislative branches to the state information technology advisory committee. The committee shall review the projects and rank those projects that receive the committee’s affirmative recommendation. The chief information officer shall submit recommendations of the committee regarding the prioritization of major information technology projects to the information technology committee, the office of management and budget, and the appropriations committees of the legislative assembly. The judicial and legislative branches shall notify biennially the committee on their major information technology projects and priorities.

Source:

S.L. 2003 Sp., ch. 665, § 16; 2007, ch. 490, § 2.

54-59-02.2.
Distributed ledger technologies — Authorization — Pilot program — Report.

The department shall research and develop the use of distributed ledger-enabled platform technologies, such as blockchains, for computer-controlled programs, data transfer and storage, and program regulation to protect against falsification, improve internal data security, and identify external hacking threats. Research must include efforts to protect the privacy of personal identifying information maintained within distributed ledger programs. The department shall select a state agency, upon the request of the state agency, to serve as a pilot program for the implementation and use of distributed ledger-enabled platform technologies. Before June first of each even-numbered year, the chief information officer shall report to the legislative management regarding the implementation of distributed ledger technologies.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 469, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

54-59-03.
Chief information officer of the state.

The governor shall appoint the chief information officer of the state. The governor shall appoint the chief information officer on the basis of education, experience, and other qualifications in information technology and administration. The position of chief information officer is not a classified position. The chief information officer serves at the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall set the salary of the chief information officer within the limits of legislative appropriations.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 3.

54-59-04.
Duties of chief information officer.

The chief information officer shall:

Administer the department.

Employ any personnel determined to be necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the department and duties as prescribed by law.

Fix the salaries of all employees within the department, within the limits of legislative appropriation. All personnel within the department are entitled to actual and necessary travel expenses at the same rate as for other employees of the state.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 4.

54-59-05.
Powers and duties of department.
[Effective through July 31, 2023]

The department:

Shall provide, supervise, and regulate information technology of all executive branch state entities, excluding the institutions under the control of the state board of higher education and the veterans’ home.

Shall provide network services in a way that ensures the network requirements of a single entity do not adversely affect the functionality of the whole network, facilitates open communications with the citizens of the state, minimizes the state’s investment in human resources, accommodates an ever-increasing amount of traffic, supports rapid detection and resolution of problems, protects the network infrastructure from damage and security breaches, provides for the aggregation of data, voice, video, and multimedia into a statewide transport mechanism or backbone, and provides for the network support for the entity to carry out its mission.

May review and approve additional network services that are not provided by the department.

May purchase, finance the purchase, or lease equipment, software, or implementation services or replace, including by trade or resale, equipment or software as may be necessary to carry out this chapter. With the exception of agreements entered related to the statewide interoperable radio network, an agreement to finance the purchase of software, equipment, or implementation services may not exceed a period of five years. The department shall submit any intended financing proposal for the purchase of software, equipment, or implementation services under this subsection, which is in excess of one million dollars, to the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session before executing a financing agreement. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. If the legislative assembly or the budget section does not approve the execution of a financing agreement, the department may not proceed with the proposed financing arrangement. With the exception of financing for the statewide interoperable radio network, the department may finance the purchase of software, equipment, or implementation services only to the extent the purchase amount does not exceed seven and one-half percent of the amount appropriated to the department during that biennium.

Shall review requests for lease, purchase, or other contractual acquisition of information technology as required by this subsection. Each executive branch agency or institution, excluding the institutions under the control of the board of higher education, shall submit to the department, in accordance with guidelines established by the department, a written request for the lease, purchase, or other contractual acquisition of information technology. The department shall review requests for conformance with the requesting entity’s information technology plan and compliance with statewide policies and standards. If the request is not in conformance or compliance, the department may disapprove the request or require justification for the departure from the plan or statewide policy or standard.

Shall provide information technology, including assistance and advisory service, to the executive, legislative, and judicial branches. If the department is unable to fulfill a request for service from the legislative or judicial branch, the information technology may be procured by the legislative or judicial branch within the limits of legislative appropriations.

Shall request and review information, including project startup information summarizing the project description, project objectives, business need or problem, cost-benefit analysis, and project risks and a project closeout information summarizing the project objectives achieved, project budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, regarding any major information technology project of an executive branch agency. The department shall present the information to the information technology committee on request of the committee.

May request and review information regarding any information technology project of an executive branch agency with a total cost of between one hundred thousand and five hundred thousand dollars as determined necessary by the department. The department shall present the information to the information technology committee on request of the committee.

Shall study emerging technology and evaluate its impact on the state’s system of information technology.

Shall develop guidelines for reports to be provided by each agency of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches, excluding the institutions under the control of the board of higher education, on information technology in those entities.

Shall collaborate with the state board of higher education on guidelines for reports to be provided by institutions under control of the state board of higher education on information technology in those entities.

Shall perform all other duties necessary to carry out this chapter.

May provide wide area network services to a state agency, city, county, school district, or other political subdivision of this state. The information technology department may not provide wide area network service to any private, charitable, or nonprofit entity except the information technology department may continue to provide the wide area network service the department provided to the private, charitable, and nonprofit entities receiving services from the department on January 1, 2003.

Shall assure proper measures for security, firewalls, and internet protocol addressing at the state’s interface with other facilities.

Notwithstanding subsection 13, may provide wide area network services for a period not to exceed four years to an occupant of a technology park associated with an institution of higher education or to a business located in a business incubator associated with an institution of higher education.

Shall advise and oversee cybersecurity strategy for all executive branch state agencies, including institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, counties, cities, school districts, or other political subdivisions. For purposes of this subsection, the department shall consult with the attorney general on cybersecurity strategy.

Shall advise and consult with the legislative and judicial branches regarding cybersecurity strategy.

Notwithstanding chapter 54-40.2, may enter a memorandum of understanding with other state, local, tribal, or territorial governments of the United States for purposes of ensuring the confidentiality, availability, and integrity of state, local, and tribal information systems and data, including consulting, developing cybersecurity strategy, prevention of cybersecurity incidents, and response strategies to cybersecurity incidents. The department may charge an amount equal to the cost of the services rendered by the department to all agencies that receive and expend moneys from other than the general fund.

Notwithstanding chapter 54-40.2, may enter a mutual aid agreement with other state, local, tribal, or territorial governments of the United States agreeing to the reciprocal exchange of resources and services for mutual benefit of the parties related to cybersecurity efforts for the purposes of responding to or mitigating active cybersecurity incidents. The department may receive in-kind benefits that reduce cybersecurity risks to information technology or shall charge an amount equal to the cost of the services rendered by the department to all agencies that receive and expend moneys from other than the general fund.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 5; 2001, ch. 500, § 2; 2003, ch. 18, § 24; 2003 ch. 503, §§ 3, 4; 2003 Sp., ch. 665, §§ 18, 19; 2005, ch. 49, § 8; 2007, ch. 491, § 3; 2007, ch. 154, § 4; 2009, ch. 482, §
98; 2009, ch. 517, § 1; 2013, ch. 412, § 2; 2017, ch. 247, § 3, effective July 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 438, § 17, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 468, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 444, § 1, effective May 10, 2021; 2021, ch. 35, § 5, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 49, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 412, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 54-59-05 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 35, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2007; Section 1 of Chapter 444, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1417; and Section 6 of Chapter 49, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2021.

Section 54-59-05 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 17 of Chapter 438, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2055; and Section 2 of Chapter 468, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2110.

54-59-05.
Powers and duties of department. [Effective August 1, 2023]

The department:

Shall provide, supervise, and regulate information technology of all executive branch state entities, excluding the institutions under the control of the state board of higher education and the veterans’ home.

Shall provide network services in a way that ensures the network requirements of a single entity do not adversely affect the functionality of the whole network, facilitates open communications with the citizens of the state, minimizes the state’s investment in human resources, accommodates an ever-increasing amount of traffic, supports rapid detection and resolution of problems, protects the network infrastructure from damage and security breaches, provides for the aggregation of data, voice, video, and multimedia into a statewide transport mechanism or backbone, and provides for the network support for the entity to carry out its mission.

May review and approve additional network services that are not provided by the department.

May purchase, finance the purchase, or lease equipment, software, or implementation services or replace, including by trade or resale, equipment or software as may be necessary to carry out this chapter. An agreement to finance the purchase of software, equipment, or implementation services may not exceed a period of five years. The department shall submit any intended financing proposal for the purchase of software, equipment, or implementation services under this subsection, which is in excess of one million dollars, to the legislative assembly or the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session before executing a financing agreement. Any request considered by the budget section must comply with section 54-35-02.9. If the legislative assembly or the budget section does not approve the execution of a financing agreement, the department may not proceed with the proposed financing arrangement. The department may finance the purchase of software, equipment, or implementation services only to the extent the purchase amount does not exceed seven and one-half percent of the amount appropriated to the department during that biennium.

Shall review requests for lease, purchase, or other contractual acquisition of information technology as required by this subsection. Each executive branch agency or institution, excluding the institutions under the control of the board of higher education, shall submit to the department, in accordance with guidelines established by the department, a written request for the lease, purchase, or other contractual acquisition of information technology. The department shall review requests for conformance with the requesting entity’s information technology plan and compliance with statewide policies and standards. If the request is not in conformance or compliance, the department may disapprove the request or require justification for the departure from the plan or statewide policy or standard.

Shall provide information technology, including assistance and advisory service, to the executive, legislative, and judicial branches. If the department is unable to fulfill a request for service from the legislative or judicial branch, the information technology may be procured by the legislative or judicial branch within the limits of legislative appropriations.

Shall request and review information, including project startup information summarizing the project description, project objectives, business need or problem, cost-benefit analysis, and project risks and a project closeout information summarizing the project objectives achieved, project budget and schedule variances, and lessons learned, regarding any major information technology project of an executive branch agency. The department shall present the information to the information technology committee on request of the committee.

May request and review information regarding any information technology project of an executive branch agency with a total cost of between one hundred thousand and five hundred thousand dollars as determined necessary by the department. The department shall present the information to the information technology committee on request of the committee.

Shall study emerging technology and evaluate its impact on the state’s system of information technology.

Shall develop guidelines for reports to be provided by each agency of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches, excluding the institutions under the control of the board of higher education, on information technology in those entities.

Shall collaborate with the state board of higher education on guidelines for reports to be provided by institutions under control of the state board of higher education on information technology in those entities.

Shall perform all other duties necessary to carry out this chapter.

May provide wide area network services to a state agency, city, county, school district, or other political subdivision of this state. The information technology department may not provide wide area network service to any private, charitable, or nonprofit entity except the information technology department may continue to provide the wide area network service the department provided to the private, charitable, and nonprofit entities receiving services from the department on January 1, 2003.

Shall assure proper measures for security, firewalls, and internet protocol addressing at the state’s interface with other facilities.

Notwithstanding subsection 13, may provide wide area network services for a period not to exceed four years to an occupant of a technology park associated with an institution of higher education or to a business located in a business incubator associated with an institution of higher education.

Shall advise and oversee cybersecurity strategy for all executive branch state agencies, including institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, counties, cities, school districts, or other political subdivisions. For purposes of this subsection, the department shall consult with the attorney general on cybersecurity strategy.

Shall advise and consult with the legislative and judicial branches regarding cybersecurity strategy.

Notwithstanding chapter 54-40.2, may enter a memorandum of understanding with other state, local, tribal, or territorial governments of the United States for purposes of ensuring the confidentiality, availability, and integrity of state, local, and tribal information systems and data, including consulting, developing cybersecurity strategy, prevention of cybersecurity incidents, and response strategies to cybersecurity incidents. The department may charge an amount equal to the cost of the services rendered by the department to all agencies that receive and expend moneys from other than the general fund.

Notwithstanding chapter 54-40.2, may enter a mutual aid agreement with other state, local, tribal, or territorial governments of the United States agreeing to the reciprocal exchange of resources and services for mutual benefit of the parties related to cybersecurity efforts for the purposes of responding to or mitigating active cybersecurity incidents. The department may receive in-kind benefits that reduce cybersecurity risks to information technology or shall charge an amount equal to the cost of the services rendered by the department to all agencies that receive and expend moneys from other than the general fund.

54-59-06.
Business plan.

The department shall develop and maintain a business plan. The business plan must:

Define the department’s overall organization, mission, and delivery of services.

Define the department’s short-term and long-term goals and objectives based on customer needs.

Outline the strategies and activities necessary to meet the goals and objectives of the department while improving the efficiency of the department and improving service to customers.

Define rates and funding mechanisms necessary to finance the proposed activities of the department.

Define a method for evaluating progress toward the goals outlined in the business plan.

Determine the specific strategies and processes to ensure that agencies share information, systems, and the statewide network.

Address the processes that will be put in place to ensure that the department exercises its powers and duties with minimal delay, cost, and procedural burden to an entity receiving services from the department; to ensure that the department provides prompt, high-quality services to an entity receiving services from the department; to ensure that an entity receiving services from the department is aware of the technology available and to ensure training on its use; and to foster information technology innovation by state entities.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 6; 2001, ch. 500, § 3.

54-59-07.
State information technology advisory committee.

The state information technology advisory committee consists of the chief information officer; the commissioner of higher education or the commissioner’s designee; the attorney general or the attorney general’s designee; the secretary of state or the secretary of state’s designee; the tax commissioner or the commissioner’s designee; the chief justice of the supreme court or the chief justice’s designee; two members of the legislative assembly appointed by the legislative management, of which one member must be the chairman of the information technology committee; a minimum of eight members representing state agencies, appointed by the governor; and two members with technology management expertise representing private industry, appointed by the governor. The appointees of the governor serve at the pleasure of the governor. The chief information officer and chairman of the information technology committee shall serve as co-chairmen of the state information technology advisory committee. Additional members may be asked to participate at the request of the chairmen. The department shall provide staff services to the committee. The members of the committee representing private industry are entitled to be compensated for time spent in attendance at meetings of the committee and for other travel as approved by the chairmen of the committee at the rate of sixty-two dollars and fifty cents per day and are entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the same manner as other state officials. The compensation and expenses are to be paid from appropriations for the department. The committee shall advise the department regarding statewide information technology planning and budgeting, services of the information technology department, and statewide information technology initiatives and policy and shall review reports on major information technology projects as required by this chapter and policies, standards, and guidelines developed by the department. The chief information officer shall submit recommendations of the committee regarding information technology issues to the information technology committee for its consideration.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 7; 2001, ch. 500, § 5; 2003, ch. 503, § 5; 2005, ch. 536, § 1; 2007, ch. 490, § 3; 2009, ch. 482, § 85; 2021, ch. 49, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

54-59-08.
Required use of wide area network services.

Each state agency and institution that desires access to wide area network services and each county, city, and school district that desires access to wide area network services to transmit voice, data, or video outside that county, city, or school district shall obtain those services from the department. The chief information officer may exempt from the application of this section a county, city, or school district that demonstrates its current wide area network services are more cost-effective for or more appropriate for the specific needs of that county, city, or school district than wide area network services available from the department. For purposes of enhanced 9-1-1 and next generation 9-1-1 communications services, governmental entities are exempt from the provisions of this section. In selecting enhanced 9-1-1 and next generation 9-1-1 communication network providers, governmental entities shall select providers that are cost-effective, demonstrably reliable, and which follow interoperable standards set by the emergency services communications coordinating committee.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 8; 2009, ch. 517, § 2; 2013, ch. 435, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 435, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

54-59-09.
Information technology standards.

Based on information from state agencies and institutions, the department and the office of management and budget shall develop statewide information technology policies, standards, and guidelines. The policies, standards, and guidelines must recognize the uniqueness of certain agencies and state which agencies are included or exempted from the policies, standards, and guidelines. The policies, standards, and guidelines must be reviewed by the state information technology advisory committee. Each executive branch state agency and institution, excluding the institutions under the control of the board of higher education, shall comply with the policies and standards developed by the department and the office of management and budget unless the chief information officer exempts an agency from the policies, standards, and guidelines to address situations unique to that agency. Unless an exemption is granted by the chief information officer, each entity receiving wide area network services provided by the department shall comply with the policies and standards developed by the department with respect to access to or use of wide area network services.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 9; 2003 Sp., ch. 665, § 20; 2007, ch. 154, § 5; 2007, ch. 490, § 4.

54-59-10.
Information technology coordinators.

Each agency or institution shall appoint an information technology coordinator. The coordinator shall maintain liaison with the department and assist the department in areas related to making the most economical use of information technology.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 10.

54-59-11.
Information technology plans.

Each executive branch state agency or institution, excluding the institutions under the control of the board of higher education, unless the chief information officer grants an exemption, shall participate in the information technology planning process based on guidelines developed by the department. The plan must be submitted to the department by August fifteenth of each even-numbered year unless the chief information officer grants an extension. The department shall review each entity’s plan for compliance with statewide information technology policies and standards and may require an entity to change its plan to comply with statewide policies or standards or to resolve conflicting directions among plans. Agencies of the judicial and legislative branches shall file their information technology plans with the department by August fifteenth of each even-numbered year. Based on the plans, the department shall prepare a statewide information technology plan and distribute copies of that plan to members of the legislative assembly as requested by the legislative council. The statewide information technology plan must be developed with emphasis on long-term strategic goals, objectives, and accomplishments.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 11; 2001, ch. 500, § 6; 2003, ch. 503, § 6; 2007, ch. 491, § 4; 2007, ch. 154, § 6; 2009, ch. 482, §
86; 2009, ch. 517, § 3.

54-59-11.1.
Information technology project planning.

Each executive branch state agency, excluding entities under the control of the state board of higher education, considering the development of an information technology project with an estimated cost of one hundred thousand dollars or more shall involve the information technology department in the planning and study of the project. A state agency must receive a recommendation from the information technology department prior to proceeding with any study relating to the project.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 52, § 5.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2013.

54-59-12.
Coordination of activities — Reports.

The department shall cooperate with each state entity providing access to any computer database or electronically filed or stored information under subsection 4 of section 44-04-18 to assist in providing economical, efficient, and compatible access. The chief information officer shall conduct conferences and meetings with political subdivisions to review and coordinate information technology. The chief information officer and the chief information officer of the North Dakota university system shall meet at least twice each year to plan and coordinate their information technology. The chief information officer and the chief information officer of the North Dakota university system shall consider areas in which joint or coordinated information technology may result in more efficient and effective state government operations. Upon request, the chief information officer shall report to the legislative management regarding the coordination of services with political subdivisions, and the chief information officer and the chief information officer of the North Dakota university system shall report to the legislative management regarding their findings and recommendations.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 12; 2009, ch. 482, § 87; 2015, ch. 385, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 385, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

54-59-13.
Compliance reviews. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 665, § 21.

54-59-14.
Information technology operating account.

The department shall establish a state information technology operating account in the state treasury to be used, in accordance with legislative appropriation, for procuring and maintaining information technology and network services and for providing information technology, network services, and central microfilm unit services to state entities and network services to users of the state network. Unless exempted by law, each agency or institution provided with information technology or network services shall pay to the department the charges as determined by the department. The department shall deposit the amounts received in the information technology operating account or the information technology development account, as appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 14; 2003, ch. 503, § 7.

54-59-15.
Acceptance of funds.

The department may accept federal or other funds, which must be deposited in the information technology operating account or other accounts specified by the office of management and budget and which may be spent subject to legislative appropriation. The department may apply for any public or private grants available for the improvement of information technology.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 15; 2013, ch. 52, § 6.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 52, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

54-59-16.
Confidentiality.

The department may receive from various agencies and various agencies may provide to the department any information from the agencies necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter without regard to the confidential nature of the information. Each agency shall notify the department regarding the confidential nature of any information submitted to the department. The department is subject to the same restrictions and penalties regarding the dissemination of this information as the entity involved. Except for a request for access authorized by section 54-10-22.1 or a request to access information collected to carry out section 54-59-09, 54-59-11, or 54-59-13, the department shall refer a request for access to or inspection of information provided by an agency to that agency for response. Referral to the agency satisfies any responsibility of the department to provide that information under open records requirements. Upon court order, the department shall provide access to or inspection of this information in accordance with restrictions of that entity involved governing dissemination of that information.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 483, § 16; 2001, ch. 500, § 7.

Note.

Section 54-59-13, referred to above, was repealed by S.L. 2003, Sp., ch. 665, § 21.

54-59-17.
Educational technology council — Meetings — Compensation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 501, § 6; 2003, ch. 138, § 96; 2003, ch. 504, § 1; repealed by 2019, ch. 144, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

54-59-18.
North Dakota educational technology council — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 501, § 7; 2007, ch. 156, § 10; repealed by 2019, ch. 144, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

54-59-19.
Information technology department annual report.

The department shall prepare and present an annual report to the information technology committee. The report must contain:

A list of all projects for which financing agreements have been executed.

A comparison of the department’s rates charged for services compared to rates charged for comparable services in other states and in the private sector.

Information regarding the delivery of services to agencies, including service dependability, agency complaints, and information technology department responsiveness.

A description of the status and progress of programs established pursuant to chapter 54-46 and as specifically required by section 54-46-11.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 500, § 8; 2007, ch. 63, § 4; 2007, ch. 492, § 2; 2007, ch. 491, § 5; 2017, ch. 373, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

54-59-20.
Security background information.

The chief information officer may require as a condition of employment or as a condition of contracting with the department that individuals, including any individuals employed by the contractor or a subcontractor to perform work under the contract, who have unescorted physical access to the facilities or other security-sensitive areas of the department designated by the chief information officer submit to a criminal history record check in accordance with section 12-60-24. The chief information officer may require as a condition of contracting with the department or other state agency or department with respect to an information technology project that any individual employed by the contractor or a subcontractor to perform the work under the contract submit to a criminal history record check in accordance with section 12-60-24.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 505, § 1; 2005, ch. 111, § 11; 2007, ch. 491, § 6; 2007, ch. 115, § 20; 2019, ch. 470, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

54-59-21.
Criminal justice information sharing board — Membership — Duties and powers — Director — Exempt records. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 506, § 1; 2007, ch. 491, § 7; 2007, ch. 30, § 18; 2009, ch. 518, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 37, § 15, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 15 of chapter 37, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

54-59-22.
Required use of electronic mail, file and print server administration, database administration, application server, and hosting services.

Each state agency and institution, excluding the legislative and judicial branches, the institutions under the control of the state board of higher education, the attorney general, the veterans’ home, and any entity exempted by the office of management and budget after advisement by the information technology department, shall obtain electronic mail, file and print server administration, database administration, storage, application server, and hosting services through a delivery system established by the information technology department in conjunction with the office of management and budget. The office of management and budget, after receiving advice from the information technology department, shall establish policies and guidelines for the delivery of services, including the transition from existing systems to functional consolidation, with consideration given to the creation of efficiencies, cost-savings, and improved quality of service.

Source:

S.L. 2003 Sp., ch. 665, § 16; 2013, ch. 52, § 7; 2021, ch. 35, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 52, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.